District of Columbia statutes.
4-216.01

Mayor to prescribe regulations.

(a)

Consistent with § 4-209.04, the Mayor is directed to prescribe regulations governing the custody, use, and preservation of the records, papers, files, and communications of the Mayor relating to public assistance. Except as otherwise provided, these regulations shall provide safeguards restricting the use or disclosure of information concerning applicants for or recipients of, public assistance to purposes directly connected with the administration of public assistance.

(b)

No person who obtains information by virtue of any regulation made pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall use such information for commercial or political purposes.

(c)

This section and § 4-218.02 shall be construed as state legislation conforming to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 1306a.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1601, 29 DCR 1060
Sept. 10, 1985, D.C. Law 6-35, § 2(q), 32 DCR 3778
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(ttt), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-216.1.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(ttt) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(ttt) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(ttt) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(ttt) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(ttt) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).